Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.540

Ballots—Removing from voting center or ballot drop location.

Any person who, without lawful authority, removes a ballot from a voting center or ballot drop location is guilty of a class C felony punishable to the same extent as a class C felony that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2017 c 283 s 3; 2011 c 10 s 72; 2003 c 111 s 2124. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.010; prior: 1893 c 115 s 2; RRS s 5396. Formerly RCW 29.85.010.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1992." [ 1991 c 81 s 42.]